Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Chapter 16

Sorghum Molasses

53-16-101. Labeling.

All sorghum molasses that is sold or offered for sale in this state shall be prominently labeled as being either one hundred percent (100%) pure sorghum molasses or not pure sorghum molasses. Only sorghum molasses that contains no additives shall be labeled as one hundred percent (100%) pure sorghum molasses.

Acts 2012, ch. 552, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 552, § 2. March 8, 2012.

53-16-102. Construction regarding testing.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require the department of agriculture to test, or cause to be tested, any sorghum molasses.

Acts 2012, ch. 552, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 552, § 2. March 8, 2012.

53-16-103. Cause of action for loss.

Any person who suffers an injury or death, or an ascertainable loss of money or property, as a result of a violation of this chapter, may bring an action individually to recover actual damages.

The action may be brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county where the alleged violation took place or is taking place, or in the county in which such person resides, has such person's principal place of business, conducts, transacts, or has transacted business, or, if the person cannot be found in any of the foregoing locations, in the county in which such person can be found.

The trial court may award reasonable expenses, including court costs, discretionary costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to a plaintiff who prevails in a proceeding that is brought pursuant to this chapter.

On termination of the proceeding, the trial court may require the plaintiff to pay any defendant's reasonable expenses, including court costs, discretionary costs and reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred in defending the proceeding if the court finds that the proceeding was commenced without reasonable cause.

Acts 2012, ch. 552, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 552, § 2. March 8, 2012.